Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-154
Common carriers; consignor; violation of shipping instructions; damages.

If, under section 75-153, a consignor of personal property violates written shipping instructions given by the consignee to the consignor a reasonable time prior to the making of the shipment, the consignor shall be liable for actual damages to the consignee or any public carrier injured by the failure of the consignor to comply with the written shipping instructions given the consignor by the consignee.

Laws 1965, c. 444, § 3, p. 1413;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 65.